Hawaii statutes.
[§415A-4] Prohibited activities. A
professional corporation shall not engage in any profession or business other
than the profession or professions and businesses permitted by its articles of
incorporation, except that a professional corporation may invest its funds in
real estate, mortgages, stocks, bonds, or any other type of investment. [L
1985, c 259, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next